California statutes. Education Code
The parent or guardian of the pupil shall be notified of the results of the assessment. The Department of Education shall conduct an equivalency study of all language proficiency tests designated for the identification of pupils of limited English proficiency to insure uniformity of language classifications and to insure the reliability and validity of such tests. Tests, materials, and procedures to
 determine proficiency shall be selected to meet psychometric standards and administered so as not to be racially, culturally, or sexually discriminatory. 

The Department of Education shall annually evaluate the adequacy of and designate the instruments to be used by school districts, and such instruments shall be available by March 15 of each year.

The assessments shall be conducted by persons who speak and understand English and the primary language of the pupils assessed, who are adequately trained and prepared to evaluate cultural and ethnic factors, and who shall follow procedures formulated by the superintendent to determine which pupils are pupils of limited English proficiency, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 52163. A school district may require that the assessment be conducted by persons who hold a valid, regular California teaching credential and who meet the other qualifications specified in this
 paragraph. The superintendent may waive the requirement that the assessment be conducted by persons who can speak and understand the pupil’s primary language where the primary language is spoken by a small number of pupils and the district certifies that it is unable to comply. This certification shall be accompanied by a statement from the district superintendent that the chairperson of the district advisory committee on bilingual education has been consulted and was unable to assist in the effort to locate appropriate individuals to administer the assessment.

Any district may elect to follow federal census requirements provided that the language skills described in subdivision (m) of Section 52163 are assessed, and provided that such procedures are consistent with Section 52164, the district shall be exempt from the state census procedures described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52164.2.

The Department of Education shall review the results of the census each year. Where the information provided by a school district appears to be inaccurate or where parents, teachers, or counselors file a formal written complaint that the census is inaccurate, the department shall audit the district’s census. Where the department concludes that the census has been incorrectly taken, or the results appear to be inaccurate, the department shall require another census to be taken and the corrected information to be provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 12.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52164.3.

(a) Each school district shall reassess pupils whose primary language is other than English, whether they are designated as limited English proficient, or fluent English proficient, when a parent or guardian, teacher, or school site administrator claims that there is a reasonable doubt about the accuracy of the pupil’s designation.

(b) In all cases of reassessment, the parent or guardian of the pupil shall be notified of the result. This notice shall be given orally when school personnel have reason to think that a written notice will not be
 understood.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 13.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52164.4.

If a previously untested pupil enrolling in a school for the first time speaks a language other than English in the home, such pupil shall be enrolled as a pupil of limited English proficiency in a bilingual program pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), (e), or (f) of Section 52163 at least until that child has been assessed pursuant to Section 52164.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 14.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52164.5.

Pertinent information from the assessment of language skills for each pupil whose primary language is other than English shall be retained by the school district as long as the pupil is enrolled in the district. Each school district shall report annually to the Department of Education, and the department shall report to the State Board of Education, the number of pupils (1) whose primary language is other than English; (2) who are of limited English proficiency; (3) whose primary language is other than English who are enrolled in classes defined in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e) or (f) of Section 52163; (4) the number of such pupils who have become
 bilingual and literate in English and in their primary language, as appropriate; and (5) the number of such pupils who have met the language reclassification criteria for exit criteria pursuant to Section 52164.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 15.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52164.6.

Reclassification criteria shall be established by each school district in which pupils of limited English proficiency are enrolled. The criteria shall determine when pupils of limited English proficiency have developed the English language skills necessary to succeed in an English-only classroom. The reclassification process shall, at a minimum, utilize multiple criteria, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Teacher evaluation, including a review of the pupil’s curriculum
 mastery. 

(b) Objective assessment of language proficiency and reading and writing skills.

(c) Parental opinion and consultation.

(d) An empirically established range of performance in basic skills, based on nonminority English-proficient pupils of the same grade and age, which demonstrates that the pupil is sufficiently proficient in English to succeed in an English-only classroom.

The board shall adopt regulations setting forth standards for language reclassification criteria to be adopted by school districts. The board’s regulations shall, at a minimum, prescribe a reclassification process that utilizes multiple criteria as required by this section.

Each school district shall, in following the board’s regulations establish
 criteria for determining when pupils of limited English proficiency enrolled in programs defined in Section 52163 have developed the English language skills of comprehension, speaking, reading, and writing necessary to succeed in an English-only instructional setting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

52165.

Each pupil of limited English proficiency enrolled in the California public school system in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall receive instruction in a language understandable to the pupil that recognizes the pupil’s primary language and teaches the pupil English.

(a) In kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, the following shall apply:

(1) If the language census indicates that any school of a school district has 10 or more pupils of limited English proficiency with the same primary language in the same grade level or 10 or more pupils of limited English proficiency with the same primary language, in the same age group, and in a multigrade or ungraded instructional environment, the school district shall offer instruction pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 52163 for those pupils at the school. If there are pupils of limited English proficiency with different primary languages who do not otherwise satisfy the program requirements of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 52163 or of this subdivision, a language development specialist defined in subdivision (b) may be used.

(2) To the extent state or federal categorical funds are available, the services, as described in this paragraph, are required
 for pupils of limited English proficiency in concentrations of fewer than 10 per grade level. If there are fewer than 10 pupils of limited English proficiency in the same grade, but at least 20 pupils of limited English proficiency in the school with the same primary language, the school district shall provide at least one certified bilingual-crosscultural teacher or teachers on waiver as defined in Section 52178 and an elementary level individual learning program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 52163 for those pupils at the school. If the number of pupils of limited English proficiency in the school exceeds 45, the district shall provide two of those teachers. These teachers may be used as resource teachers or team teachers or to provide any other services to pupils of limited English proficiency as the district deems appropriate. These teachers shall be different teachers than those required pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) The
 Legislature recognizes that in the past equal educational opportunities have not been fully available to secondary pupils of limited English proficiency. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage school districts to offer a language learning program pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 52163. Certified bilingual-crosscultural teachers or, if those teachers are not available, language development specialists assisted by a bilingual aide shall be qualified to provide instruction for those programs. Language development specialists shall be formally trained and competent in the field of English language learning, including second language acquisition and development, structure of modern English, and basic principles of linguistics, and shall meet the culture and methodology competencies established by subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 44253.5. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall provide for the assessment of language competencies specified in this section and shall modify existing culture
 and methodology competency for language development specialist to ensure that they meet the crosscultural and instructional methodologies for pupils being served by those teachers. A teacher of English to speakers of other languages certificate from a commission-approved teacher training institution of higher education that meets the criteria established by the commission pursuant to Section 44253.5 shall be accepted instead of the methodology requirement.

(c) In kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, pupils of limited English proficiency who are not enrolled in a program described in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of Section 52163 shall be individually evaluated and shall receive educational services defined in subdivision (e) or (f), as appropriate, of Section 52163. These services shall be provided in consultation with the pupil and the parent, parents, or guardian of the pupil.

(d) As a part of its consolidated application for categorical program funds, each district receiving those funds shall include a specific plan indicating the ways in which the individual learning plans will meet the needs of pupils of limited English proficiency. The plan shall describe all of the following:

(1) Procedures used in making the individual evaluation.

(2) The pupils’ levels of English and primary language proficiency and levels of educational performance.

(3) Instructional objectives and scope of educational services to be provided.

(4) Periodic evaluation procedures, using objective criteria, to determine whether the instructional objectives are being met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 47.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

52166.

All teachers and aides providing instruction in programs established pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or, unless waived by the board, (c) of Section 52163, shall meet the criteria of subdivision (h) or (i) of Section 52163. In the event a school operates an individualized program described in subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 52163, such a district which receives categorical aid funds to meet the needs of pupils of limited English proficiency shall certify to the board that sufficient teachers and aides meeting the criteria of subdivision (h) or (i) of Section 52163, as appropriate, are available to the school to ensure that all pupils of limited English
 proficiency have instructional opportunities in both English and their primary language to meet the intent of this chapter. Other instructional personnel who are not bilingual-crosscultural as defined in subdivisions (h) and (i) of Section 52163 may provide instructional and educational services to pupils enrolled in programs established pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 52163 if the principal teachers and aides providing instruction in such programs meet the criteria established in subdivisions (h), unless waived by the board pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 52163, and (i) of Section 52163.

In the development of teacher evaluation procedures pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 1 of Part 25, the governing board of each school district may ensure that a teacher meeting the criteria of subdivision (h) of Section 52163 is evaluated on the basis of his or her classroom performance
 by an onsite administrator upon the advice of another person meeting the criteria of subdivision (h) of Section 52163.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 18.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52167.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in classes established pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 52165, not more than two-thirds nor less than one-third of the pupils shall be pupils of limited English proficiency. The remaining proportion of pupils in the class shall be pupils of fluent English proficiency. However, where there is documented evidence that these proportions
 cannot be met, the classroom proportions shall, at a minimum, reflect the proportion of the language proficiency classification for the particular grade level in the school and shall not result in segregation. Fluent-English-proficient pupils shall receive basic skills instruction in English and, to the extent possible, be achieving at the district norm.

(2) In no event shall the primary purpose of the program be to teach a world language to English-speaking pupils.

(3) The state board shall adopt any necessary regulations governing this section within 90 days after January 1, 1981.

(b) The classroom proportion specified in subdivision (a) may be modified for the purpose of providing effective instruction for all pupils in core academic subjects. Pupils of limited English proficiency participating in programs
 established pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 52165 shall receive instruction for at least 20 percent of the schoolday in classes in which the proportions specified in subdivision (a) are met, and shall receive instruction in classes with pupils of fluent English proficiency for an increased portion of the schoolday, as their English language skills increase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 25.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

52168.

(a) The superintendent shall ensure that funds appropriated for purposes of this article supplement and do not supplant categorical funds allocated from other local or state sources in meeting the needs of pupils of limited English proficiency.

Categorical aid funds used for the purposes of Section 52165 shall not exceed, on a per pupil basis, the maximum allowance established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 54004.5 and regulations implementing that section. Categorical funds used for the purposes of Section 52165 shall include all state and local categorical aid funds which are wholly
 or partially allocated on the basis of the educational needs of limited-English-proficient pupils.

(b) School districts may claim funds appropriated for purposes of this article for expenditures in, but not limited to, the following categories:

(1) The employment of bilingual-crosscultural teachers and aides; however, funds are available for employment expenditures only to the extent such personnel are employed in providing bilingual services to eligible pupils. School districts applying for these funds shall submit an assurance that personnel hired for this program only supplement and do not supplant district personnel whose positions are funded by the district general fund.

(2) The purchase and development of special bilingual-bicultural teaching materials.

(3) The costs of special in-service training to develop bilingual-crosscultural instructional skills with preference given to teachers and teacher aides employed as part of the bilingual-bicultural program.

(4) Reasonable expenses (which may include transportation, child care, translation services, meals, and training) of parent advisory groups on bilingual-bicultural education, at the school and school district level, in the course of their duties as members of the parent advisory groups. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations defining reasonable expenses.

(5) Health and auxiliary services to the extent that they meet the direct needs of eligible pupils.

(6) Reasonable district administrative expenses including, but not limited to, costs incurred for the census of pupils of
 limited English proficiency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 52164.1, assessments pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 52164.1, and parent consultation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 52173 allowed pursuant to regulations of the board.

(c) Nothing contained in this section shall be interpreted to authorize school districts to reduce per pupil expenditures from local, state, or federal sources for the education of pupils of limited English proficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 20.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52169.

(a) The requirements for establishing programs mandated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52165 shall be in effect beginning with the 1977–78 school year.

(b) Nothing contained in this section shall be interpreted to authorize school districts to reduce per pupil expenditures from local, state, or federal sources for the education of limited-English-speaking pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

52170.

(a) Each school which has enrolled one or more pupils of limited English proficiency shall prepare a plan to meet the needs of pupils of limited English proficiency in attendance in the school.

(1) Only those schools with 10 or more pupils with the same primary language in a grade level or 20 or more such pupils in the school and which receive consolidated application funding shall submit such plans to the superintendent.

(2) Schools with less than 10 pupils of limited English proficiency receiving
 consolidated application funding as well as schools with 10 or more pupils of limited English proficiency not receiving such funding shall develop and retain their plan to meet such pupils’ needs. Such plan shall be available to the superintendent and the public upon request.

(b) Schools required to submit plans shall prepare an application on forms provided by the Department of Education. Such application shall meet the applicable criteria of the consolidated application regulations and shall include, in addition, all of the following components:

(1) Teacher and aide preservice training which will identify and improve knowledge levels of each teacher and aide in teaching methodology, bilingual-crosscultural philosophy, and education.

(2) An in-service training program for teachers and aides that is linked with an
 institution of higher education, to the maximum extent feasible, which shall include the establishment of a liaison with a nearby institution of higher education and the solicitation of help from such institution in order to upgrade continually the bilingual-crosscultural education program.

(3) An assurance that all bilingual-crosscultural aides are provided the opportunity to enroll in a career ladder program leading toward a single- or multiple-subject teaching credential and a certificate of competence in bilingual-crosscultural education.

(c) The district’s application to the Department of Education shall include all of the individual school applications.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 23.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52171.

Each district shall submit annually to the department an evaluation of pupil progress for every program that has been approved pursuant to this article in a form and manner prescribed by the superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

52172.

Teachers and teacher aides who are not bilingual-crosscultural teachers and aides, as defined by subdivisions (h) and (i) of Section 52163, shall not be permitted to teach in programs authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or, unless waived by the board, (c) of Section 52163, except as provided in Sections 52166 and 52178, or except as staffing requirements are waived by the board pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 52163. It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of Section 44955 shall apply to this section. However, in no case shall a school district dismiss a fully certificated teacher, who
 previously taught in the bilingual-bicultural program pursuant to a waiver granted under Section 52178, solely on the basis that such waiver has expired. Even if such person is unable to qualify for a bilingual credential or a bilingual-crosscultural certificate of competence, he or she shall retain his or her status, seniority, and rights as a probationary or permanent employee, as the case may be, for the purpose of serving as a monolingual teacher in other programs offered by the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 27.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52173.

(a) Prior to the enrollment of any pupils in any program authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of Section 52163, parents or guardians of pupils of all potential participants shall be provided the opportunity for consultation about the placement of their child or ward in such a program. To achieve this purpose, the governing board of the school district in which the pupil resides shall notify by mail or in person the parent, parents, or guardian of the pupil of the fact that their child or ward will be enrolled in a program of bilingual education. The notice shall: (1) contain a simple, nontechnical description of
 the purposes, method, and content of the program in which their child or ward will be enrolled; (2) inform the parent, parents, or guardian that the parent, parents, or guardian have the right and are encouraged to visit such classes in which their child or ward will be enrolled and to come to the school for a conference to explain the nature and objectives of such education; (3) further inform the parent, parents, or guardian that they have the right, if they so wish, not to have their child or ward enrolled in such an education program; (4) inform the parent, parents, or guardian that they have the opportunity to participate in the school or school district advisory committee, or both. The written notice shall be in English and in the primary language of the pupil.

(b) Any parent or guardian whose child or ward has been or will be enrolled in programs authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of Section 52163 shall have the
 right, either at the time of the original notification of enrollment or at the close of any semester thereafter, to withdraw his or her child or ward from the program, by written notice to the principal of the school in which his or her child or ward is enrolled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 28.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52174.

Nothing in this article shall preclude the participation by an individual school district in a consortium or a cooperative in order to provide support and contract services to school districts that receive funds for the purposes of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 30.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52175.

A school district governing board may allow a nonresident pupil of limited English proficiency to enroll in or attend its program authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of Section 52163 subject to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 46600) of Part 26, if the tuition of the child is paid by the school district in which the pupil resides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 31.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1339.)
-------------------------------------------

52176.

(a) Each school district with more than 50 pupils of limited English proficiency shall establish a districtwide advisory committee on bilingual education. Parents or guardians, or both, of pupils of limited English proficiency who are not employed by the district shall constitute a majority of the committee, unless the district designates for this purpose an existing districtwide advisory committee on which parents or guardians, or both, of pupils of limited English proficiency have membership in at least the same percentage as their children and wards represent of the total number of pupils in the district, provided that a
 subcommittee on bilingual-bicultural education on which parents or guardians, or both, of pupils of limited English proficiency constitute a majority is established. The district advisory committee and subcommittee, if applicable, shall be responsible for at least six specific tasks. These tasks shall be to advise the district governing board regarding all of the following:

(1) Establishment of a timetable for development of a district master plan for bilingual education.

(2) Districtwide needs assessment on a school-by-school basis.

(3) Establishment of district program goals and objectives in bilingual education.

(4) A plan to ensure district compliance with the provisions of Section 52178. 

(5) Administration of the annual language census.

(b) Each school with more than 20 pupils of limited English proficiency shall establish a school level advisory committee on which parents or guardians, or both, of such pupils constitute membership in at least the same percentage as their children and wards represent of the total number of pupils in the school. The school may designate for this purpose an existing school level advisory committee, or subcommittee of such an advisory committee, if the advisory committee, or subcommittee where appropriate, meets the criteria stated above.

(c) Each school advisory committee maintained pursuant to this section shall be responsible for advising the principal and staff in the development of a detailed master plan for bilingual education for the individual school and submitting the plan to the governing board for
 consideration for inclusion in the district master plan. It shall also be responsible for assisting in the development of the school needs assessment, language census, and ways to make parents aware of the importance of regular school attendance.

The Department of Education shall develop guidelines for the selection of advisory committees established or maintained pursuant to this section by May 1, 1981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1339, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

52177.

Out of funds appropriated for these purposes, the superintendent shall administer this article. The responsibilities of the superintendent in administering this article shall include, but are not limited to, ensuring all of the following:

(a) Sufficient bilingual personnel are available within the department with familiarity, competency, and proficiency in bilingual-crosscultural instruction to meet the needs of this article and to administer, review, monitor, and evaluate the use of state or federal
 categorical aid funds allocated to local districts which have been wholly or partially allocated on the basis of the educational needs of pupils of limited-English proficiency.

(b) Department personnel responsible for the administration, review, monitoring, or evaluation of programs operating pursuant to this article have been sufficiently trained to carry out the intent of this article to meet the needs of the pupil of limited-English proficiency.

(c) There is within the department an administrative unit responsible for bilingual-bicultural educational programs and policies through which the superintendent shall carry out his or her functions pursuant to this article.

(d) Districts are providing each pupil of limited-English proficiency with an educational opportunity equal to that available to English-speaking
 pupils; they are making appropriate use of local and state general funds to provide bilingual-crosscultural teachers and other required services; and an annual report is made to the Legislature regarding the extent to which this article has been implemented by school districts throughout the state. All districts in which pupils of limited-English proficiency are enrolled shall be reviewed through an onsite technical assistance, monitoring, and enforcement process at least once every three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 750, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

52178.

All principal teachers providing instruction in programs defined by subdivision (a), (b), or, unless waived by the board, (c), and insofar as teachers are available, (d) of Section 52163 shall be bilingual-crosscultural teachers as defined pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 52163, or shall be bilingual in English and the primary language of the pupils of limited-English proficiency in the bilingual class and hold an internship credential or an emergency bilingual-crosscultural credential.

In recognition of the shortage of qualified bilingual-crosscultural teachers, a school district
 may request a renewable two-year waiver from the board for each teacher who is not bilingual-crosscultural but who is enrolled and participating in a program leading to a bilingual specialist credential or a certificate of competence for bilingual-crosscultural instruction pursuant to Section 44253.5. Such a teacher, with the assistance of a bilingual-crosscultural aide, may teach in a program of bilingual instruction mandated by Section 52165 for not more than four school years, except as otherwise provided by this section, commencing with the first year that the teacher was under waiver, so long as continuing progress toward the certificate of competence is indicated in accordance with this section.

Each school district which requests waivers shall file its application for such a waiver with the State Board of Education on or before October 1 of the appropriate year, and shall give assurance that all teachers receiving such a waiver are, or will be, participating
 in, and fulfilling the requirements of, an appropriate program, as specified in this section, leading to a bilingual specialist credential or a certificate of competence for bilingual-crosscultural instruction pursuant to Section 44253.5 during each of the school years for which the waiver is granted, and shall state who is in charge of the program and which institution or district is conducting it. Existing state and federal staff development funds may be used for training and assessment leading to a bilingual specialist credential or a bilingual-crosscultural certificate of competence. The district shall further assure that all teachers receiving such a waiver have been notified in writing by the school board as to their obligations while under waiver.

The waiver application shall list the names of the teachers who are to receive the waiver, the school to which they are assigned, and the date by which the teacher is expected to obtain a bilingual specialist
 credential or the certificate of competence. Each district, whether or not it requests a waiver, shall report the number of classrooms for which a bilingual teacher is required pursuant to Section 52165, the total number of certificated bilingual-crosscultural teachers employed by the district in classroom positions, and, in the event the district requests a waiver, the total number of teachers for whom a waiver is being requested. If a district hires new teachers, no waiver shall be granted unless the board finds that the district made a good faith effort to contact, recruit, and hire bilingual-crosscultural teachers.

It is not the intent of the Legislature, by amending this section in the 1979–80 Regular Legislative Session, to expand the requirements for the certificate of bilingual-crosscultural competence.

For purposes of this section, programs for the study of language, culture, and methodology offered by accredited
 postsecondary institutions shall be approved and regulated by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. Courses for the study of language, culture, and methodology established by the State Department of Education pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 52180) of Chapter 7 of Part 28 shall be approved by the State Department of Education and shall be deemed appropriate. All other courses for the study of language, culture, or methodology offered for bilingual teachers on waiver shall meet the standards and criteria published by the State Department of Education. The department shall adopt standards and criteria for training programs in language, culture, and methodology for teachers on waiver lacking competencies in those areas.

District applications for initial waivers to commence on or after July 1, 1984, and applications for two-year renewals, shall include certification by the district that the applicant is enrolled in or will be enrolled in an approved
 language, culture, or methodology course or a course for the study of language, culture, or methodology that meets the standards and criteria adopted by the State Department of Education, and certification by the employing school district or education agency that the applicant teacher is making the following progress toward meeting the requirements for the bilingual-crosscultural certificate of competence:

(a) For the teacher who is just entering the bilingual program: no requirement.

(b) For the teacher beginning his or her second year on waiver: (1) competence in language, culture, or methodology, as required by subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 44253.5, and (2), for the teacher who is not competent in language, enrollment in a program for the study of language which is approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or enrollment in a course for the study of language
 which is established or approved by the State Department of Education, or a program which meets the standards and criteria prescribed by the department under this section.

(c) For the teacher beginning his or her third year on waiver: (1) competence in language as required by subdivision (a) of Section 44253.5, or (2) continued enrollment in a program for the study of language which is approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or continued enrollment in a course for the study of language which is established and approved by the State Department of Education, or a program which meets the standards and criteria prescribed by the department under this section.

(d) For the teacher beginning his or her fourth year on waiver: (1) competence in two of the three areas required by Section 44253.5 and (2), for the teacher who is not competent in language, continued enrollment in a
 program for the study of language which is approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or continued enrollment in a course for the study of language which is established and approved by the State Department of Education, or a program which meets the standards and criteria prescribed by the department under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1204, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bilingual Teacher Training Assistance Program [52180. - 52186.]

52180.

It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts, county offices of education and institutions of higher education, with the assistance of the State Department of Education, shall continue to provide training for teachers under bilingual teacher waivers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1169, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

52181.

The State Bilingual Teacher Training Assistance Program is hereby established for teachers who are granted waivers under Section 52178 and who are enrolled and participating in a program leading to a bilingual specialist credential or a certificate of competence for bilingual-crosscultural competence. The program shall be administered by the State Department of Education which shall, in consultation with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and representatives of bilingual educators from institutions of higher education, county offices of education, and school districts, develop annual and long-range goals and objectives for the program, based upon the reports required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 52171.6 and under Section 52178.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

52182.

(a) The State Department of Education shall establish minimum standards and criteria for the State Bilingual Teacher Training Assistance Program, and shall conduct appropriate training programs, or provide for training services by allocation to existing state staff development resource centers, county offices of education, public or private four-year institutions of postsecondary education, bilingual programs consortia, or cooperatives formed among two or more of these groups.

(b) Allocations for training programs conducted under this article shall be primarily directed toward school districts with high concentrations of pupils of limited-English-proficiency and teachers on waiver under Section 52178.

(c) In awarding allocations pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall adopt evaluative criteria demonstrating the agency’s ability to provide appropriate training services. The adopted criteria shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Demonstrated commitment to bilingual education and bilingual teacher training.

(2) Demonstrated capability to fully prepare candidates for bilingual certificates of competence in accordance with the criteria for assessment in language, methodology, and culture.

(3) The availability of bilingual education staff with demonstrated experience and knowledge of bilingual education training programs.
